District of Columbia statutes.
7-2071.12

Funding for the Ombudsman Program.

(a)

Funding sources for the Ombudsman Program shall include:

(1)

District local appropriations; and

(2)

Medicaid federal matching funds.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a corporation, organization, or consortia of organizations selected to operate the Health Care Ombudsman Program from raising private money through foundation resources to supplement government funds for the program.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-331, § 13, 52 DCR 1981

History